Washington statutes.
RCW 10.01.220

City attorney, county prosecutor, or other prosecuting authority—Filing a criminal charge—Contribution, donation, payment.

A city attorney, county prosecutor, or other prosecuting authority may not dismiss, amend, or agree not to file a criminal charge in exchange for a contribution, donation, or payment to any person, corporation, or organization. This does not prohibit:

(1) Contribution, donation, or payment to any specific fund authorized by state statute;

(2) The collection of costs associated with actual supervision, treatment, or collection of restitution under agreements to defer or divert; or

(3) Dismissal following payment that is authorized by any other statute.

[ 2007 c 367 s 1.]